Ohio, session 136, HB557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2929.20 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2929.20. (A) As used in this section: (1)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(1)(b) of this section, "eligible offender" means any person who, on or after April 7, 2009, is serving a stated prison term that includes one or more nonmandatory prison terms. A person may be an eligible offender and also may be an eighty per cent-qualifying offender or, during a declared state of emergency, a state of emergency-qualifying offender. (b) "Eligible offender" does not include any person who, on or after April 7, 2009, is serving a stated prison term for any of the following criminal offenses that was a felony and was committed while the person held a public office in this state: (i) A violation of section 2921.02, 2921.03, 2921.05, 2921.31, 2921.32, 2921.41, 2921.42, or 2923.32 of the Revised Code; (ii) A violation of section 2913.42, 2921.04, 2921.11, or 2921.12 of the Revised Code, when the conduct constituting the violation was related to the duties of the offender's public office or to the offender's actions as a public official holding that public office; (iii) A violation of an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this or any other state or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any violation listed in division (A)(1)(b)(i) of this section; (iv) A violation of an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this or any other state or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any violation listed in division (A)(1)(b)(ii) of this section, when the conduct constituting the violation was related to the duties of the offender's public office or to the offender's actions as a public official holding that public office; (v) A conspiracy to commit, attempt to commit, or complicity in committing any offense listed in division (A)(1)(b)(i) or described in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) of this section; (vi) A conspiracy to commit, attempt to commit, or complicity in committing any offense listed in division (A)(1)(b)(ii) or described in division (A)(1)(b)(iv) of this section, if the conduct constituting the offense that was the subject of the conspiracy, that would have constituted the offense attempted, or constituting the offense in which the offender was complicit was or would have been related to the duties of the offender's public office or to the offender's actions as a public official holding that public office. (2) "State of emergency-qualifying offender" means any inmate to whom all of the following apply: (a) The inmate is serving a stated prison term during a state of emergency that is declared by the governor as a direct response to a pandemic or public health emergency. (b) The geographical area covered by the declared state of emergency includes the location at which the inmate is serving the stated prison term described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section. (c) There is a direct nexus between the emergency that is the basis of the governor's declaration of the state of emergency and the circumstances of, and need for release of, the inmate. (3)(a) "Eighty per cent-qualifying offender" means an offender who is serving a stated prison term of one year or more, on or after April 4, 2023, who has commenced service of that stated prison term, who is not serving a stated prison term that includes a disqualifying prison term or a stated prison term that consists solely of one or more restricting prison terms, and to whom either of the following applies: (i) If the offender is serving a stated prison term of one year or more that includes one or more restricting prison terms and one or more eligible prison terms, the offender has fully served all restricting prison terms and has served eighty per cent of that stated prison term that remains to be served after all restricting prison terms have been fully served. (ii) If the offender is serving a stated prison term of one year or more that consists solely of one or more eligible prison terms, the offender has served eighty per cent of that stated prison term. (b) For purposes of determining whether an offender is an eighty per cent-qualifying offender under division (A)(3)(a) of this section: (i) If the offender's stated prison term includes consecutive prison terms, any restricting prison terms shall be deemed served prior to any eligible prison terms that run consecutively to the restricting prison terms, and the eligible prison terms are deemed to commence after all of the restricting prison terms have been fully served. (ii) An offender serving a stated prison term of one year or more that includes a mandatory prison term that is not a disqualifying prison term and is not a restricting prison term is not automatically disqualified from being an eighty per cent-qualifying offender as a result of the offender's service of that mandatory term for release from prison under this section, and the offender may be eligible for release from prison in accordance with this division and division (O) of this section. (4) "Nonmandatory prison term" means a prison term that is not a mandatory prison term. (5) "Public office" means any elected federal, state, or local government office in this state. (6) "Victim's representative" has the same meaning as in section 2930.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Imminent danger of death," "medically incapacitated," and "terminal illness" have the same meanings as in section 2967.05 of the Revised Code. (8) "Aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms" means the aggregate of the following: (a) All nonmandatory definite prison terms; (b) With respect to any non-life felony indefinite prison term, all nonmandatory minimum prison terms imposed as part of the non-life felony indefinite prison term or terms. (9) "Deadly weapon" and "dangerous ordnance" have the same meanings as in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code. (10) "Disqualifying prison term" means any of the following: (a) A prison term imposed for aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, involuntary manslaughter, felonious assault, kidnapping, rape, aggravated arson, aggravated burglary, or aggravated robbery; (b) A prison term imposed for complicity in, an attempt to commit, or conspiracy to commit any offense listed in division (A)(10)(a) of this section; (c) A prison term of life imprisonment, including any term of life imprisonment that has parole eligibility; (d) A prison term imposed for any felony other than carrying a concealed weapon an essential element of which is any conduct or failure to act expressly involving any deadly weapon or dangerous ordnance; (e) A prison term imposed for any violation of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code that is a felony of the first or second degree; (f) A prison term imposed for engaging in a pattern of corrupt activity in violation of section 2923.32 of the Revised Code; (g) A prison term imposed pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code; (h) A prison term imposed for any sexually oriented offense. (11) "Eligible prison term" means any prison term that is not a disqualifying prison term and is not a restricting prison term. (12) "Restricting prison term" means any of the following: (a) A mandatory prison term imposed under division (B)(1)(a), (B)(1)(c), (B)(1)(f), (B)(1)(g), (B)(2), or (B)(7) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a specification of the type described in that division; (b) In the case of an offender who has been sentenced to a mandatory prison term for a specification of the type described in division (A)(12)(a) of this section, the prison term imposed for the felony offense for which the specification was stated at the end of the body of the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense; (c) A prison term imposed for trafficking in persons; (d) A prison term imposed for any offense that is described in division (A)(12)(d)(i) of this section if division (A)(12)(d)(ii) of this section applies to the offender: (i) The offense is a felony of the first or second degree that is an offense of violence and that is not described in division (A)(10)(a) or (b) of this section, an attempt to commit a felony of the first or second degree that is an offense of violence and that is not described in division (A)(10)(a) or (b) of this section if the attempt is a felony of the first or second degree, or an offense under an existing or former law of this state, another state, or the United States that is or was substantially equivalent to any other offense described in this division. (ii) The offender previously was convicted of or pleaded guilty to any offense listed in division (A)(10) or (A)(12)(d)(i) of this section. (13) "Sexually oriented offense" has the same meaning as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (14) "Stated prison term of one year or more" means a definite prison term of one year or more imposed as a stated prison term, or a minimum prison term of one year or more imposed as part of a stated prison term that is a non-life felony indefinite prison term. (15) "Classification of the offense" means the severity of the offense as a felony of the first, second, third, fourth, or fifth degree. (B) On the motion of an eligible offender, on the motion of a state of emergency-qualifying offender made during the declared state of emergency, or on its own motion with respect to an eligible offender or with respect to a state of emergency-qualifying offender during the declared state of emergency, the sentencing court may reduce the offender's aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms through a judicial release under this section. (C)(1) Subject to division (C)(2) of this section, an eligible offender may file a motion for judicial release with the sentencing court, or a state of emergency-qualifying offender may file a motion for judicial release with the sentencing court during the declared state of emergency, within the following applicable periods: (a) If the aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms is less than two years, the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender may file the motion at any time after the offender is delivered to a state correctional institution or, if the prison term includes a mandatory prison term or terms, at any time after the expiration of all mandatory prison terms. (b) If the aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms is at least two years but less than five years, the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender may file the motion not earlier than one hundred eighty days after the offender is delivered to a state correctional institution or, if the prison term includes a mandatory prison term or terms, not earlier than one hundred eighty days after the expiration of all mandatory prison terms. (c) If the aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms is five years, the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender may file the motion not earlier than the date on which the offender has served four years of the offender's stated prison term or, if the prison term includes a mandatory prison term or terms, not earlier than four years after the expiration of all mandatory prison terms. (d) If the aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms is more than five years but not more than ten years, the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender may file the motion not earlier than the date on which the offender has served five years of the offender's stated prison term or, if the prison term includes a mandatory prison term or terms, not earlier than five years after the expiration of all mandatory prison terms. (e) If the aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms is more than ten years, the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender may file the motion not earlier than the later of the date on which the offender has served one-half of the offender's stated prison term or the date specified in division (C)(1)(d) of this section. (f) With respect to a state of emergency-qualifying offender, if the offender's prison term does not include a mandatory prison term or terms, or if the offender's prison term includes one or more mandatory prison terms and the offender has completed the mandatory prison term or terms, the state of emergency-qualifying offender may file the motion at any time during the offender's aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms, provided that time also is during the declared state of emergency. (2) During any single declared state of emergency, a state of emergency-qualifying offender may only file a motion for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender with the sentencing court during that declared state of emergency once every six months. (D)(1)(a) Upon receipt of a timely motion for judicial release filed by an eligible offender or a state of emergency-qualifying offender under division (C) of this section, or upon the sentencing court's own motion made within the appropriate time specified in that division, the court may deny the motion without a hearing or schedule a hearing on the motion. The court may grant the motion without a hearing for an offender under consideration for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender, but the court shall not grant the motion without a hearing for an offender under consideration as an eligible offender. If a court denies a motion without a hearing, the court later may consider judicial release for that eligible offender or that state of emergency-qualifying offender on a subsequent motion. For an offender under consideration for judicial release as an eligible offender, but not for one under consideration as a state of emergency-qualifying offender, the court may deny the motion with prejudice. If a court denies a motion with prejudice, the court may later consider judicial release on its own motion. For an offender under consideration for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender, the court shall not deny a motion with prejudice. For an offender under consideration for judicial release as an eligible offender, but not for one under consideration as a state of emergency-qualifying offender, if a court denies a motion after a hearing, the court shall not consider a subsequent motion for that offender based on the offender's classification as an eligible offender. The court may hold multiple hearings for any offender under consideration for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender, but shall hold only one hearing for any offender under consideration as an eligible offender. (b) If an offender is under consideration for judicial release as an eligible offender and the motion is denied, and if the offender at that time also is or subsequently becomes a state of emergency-qualifying offender, the denial does not limit or affect any right of the offender to file a motion under this section for consideration for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender or for the court on its own motion to consider the offender for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender. If an offender is under consideration for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender and the motion is denied, and if the offender at that time also is or subsequently becomes an eligible offender, the denial does not limit or affect any right of the offender to file a motion under this section for consideration for judicial release as an eligible offender or for the court on its own motion to consider the offender for judicial release as an eligible offender. (2)(a) With respect to a motion for judicial release filed by an offender as an eligible offender or made by the court on its own motion for an offender as an eligible offender, a hearing under this section shall be conducted in open court not less than thirty or more than sixty days after the motion is filed, provided that the court may delay the hearing for one hundred eighty additional days. If the court holds a hearing, the court shall enter a ruling on the motion within ten days after the hearing. If the court denies the motion without a hearing, the court shall enter its ruling on the motion within sixty days after the motion is filed. (b) With respect to a motion for judicial release filed by an offender as a state of emergency-qualifying offender or made by the court on its own motion for an offender as a state of emergency-qualifying offender, the court shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the offender was indicted and may order the prosecuting attorney to respond to the motion in writing within ten days. The prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim pursuant to the Ohio Constitution. The prosecuting attorney shall include in the response any statement that the victim wants to be represented to the court. The court shall consider any response from the prosecuting attorney and any statement from the victim in its ruling on the motion. After receiving the response from the prosecuting attorney, the court either shall order a hearing consistent with divisions (E) to (I) of this section as soon as possible, or shall enter its ruling on the motion for judicial release as soon as possible. If the court conducts a hearing, the hearing shall be conducted in open court or by a virtual, telephonic, or other form of remote hearing. If the court holds a hearing, the court shall enter a ruling on the motion within ten days after the hearing. If the court denies the motion without a hearing, the court shall enter its ruling on the motion within ten days after the motion is filed or after it receives the response from the prosecuting attorney. (E) If a court schedules a hearing under divisions (D)(1) and (2)(a) of this section or under divisions (D)(1) and (2)(b) of this section, the court shall notify the subject eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender and the head of the state correctional institution in which that subject offender is confined prior to the hearing. The head of the state correctional institution immediately shall notify the appropriate person at the department of rehabilitation and correction of the hearing, and the department within twenty-four hours after receipt of the notice, shall post on the database it maintains pursuant to section 5120.66 of the Revised Code the subject offender's name and all of the information specified in division (A)(1)(c)(i) of that section. If the court schedules a hearing for judicial release, the court promptly shall give notice of the hearing to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the subject eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender was indicted. Upon receipt of the notice from the court, the prosecuting attorney shall do whichever of the following is applicable: (1) Subject to division (E)(2) of this section, notify the victim of the offense and the victim's representative, if applicable, pursuant to the Ohio Constitution and division (B) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code; (2) If the offense was an offense of violence that is a felony of the first, second, or third degree, except as otherwise provided in this division, pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, notify the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, of the hearing regardless of whether the victim or victim's representative has requested the notification. Except when notice to the victim is required under the Ohio Constitution, the notice of the hearing shall not be given under this division to a victim or victim's representative if the victim or victim's representative has requested pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 2930.03 of the Revised Code that the victim or the victim's representative not be provided the notice. If notice is to be provided to a victim or victim's representative under this division, the prosecuting attorney may give the notice by any reasonable means, including regular mail, telephone, and electronic mail, in accordance with division (D)(1) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code. If the notice is based on an offense committed prior to March 22, 2013, the notice also shall include the opt-out information described in division (D)(1) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code. The prosecuting attorney, in accordance with division (D)(2) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code, shall keep a record of all attempts to provide the notice, and of all notices provided, under this division. Division (E)(2) of this section, and the notice-related provisions of division (K) of this section, division (D)(1) of section 2930.16, division (H) of section 2967.12, division (E)(1)(b) of section 2967.19 as it existed prior to April 4, 2023, division (A)(3)(b) of section 2967.26, division (D)(1) of section 2967.28, and division (A)(2) of section 5149.101 of the Revised Code enacted in the act in which division (E)(2) of this section was enacted, shall be known as "Roberta's Law." (F) Upon an offender's successful completion of rehabilitative activities, the head of the state correctional institution may notify the sentencing court of the successful completion of the activities. (G) Prior to the date of the hearing on a motion for judicial release made by an eligible offender, by a state of emergency-qualifying offender, or by a court on its own under this section, the head of the state correctional institution in which the subject offender is confined shall send to the court an institutional summary report on the offender's conduct in the institution and in any institution from which the offender may have been transferred. Upon the request of the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the subject offender was indicted or of any law enforcement agency, the head of the state correctional institution, at the same time the person sends the institutional summary report to the court, also shall send a copy of the report to the requesting prosecuting attorney and law enforcement agencies. The institutional summary report shall cover the subject offender's participation in school, vocational training, work, treatment, and other rehabilitative activities and any disciplinary action taken against the subject offender. The report shall be made part of the record of the hearing. A presentence investigation report is not required for judicial release. (H) If the court grants a hearing on a motion for judicial release made by an eligible offender, by a state of emergency-qualifying offender, or by a court on its own under this section, the subject offender shall attend the hearing if ordered to do so by the court. Upon receipt of a copy of the journal entry containing the order, the head of the state correctional institution in which the subject offender is incarcerated shall deliver the subject offender to the sheriff of the county in which the hearing is to be held. The sheriff shall convey the subject offender to and from the hearing. (I) At the hearing on a motion for judicial release under this section made by an eligible offender, by a state of emergency-qualifying offender, or by a court on its own, the court shall afford the subject offender and the offender's attorney an opportunity to present written and, if present, oral information relevant to the motion. The court shall afford a similar opportunity to the prosecuting attorney, the victim, the victim's representative, the victim's attorney, if applicable, and any other person the court determines is likely to present additional relevant information. The court shall consider any oral or written statement of a victim, victim's representative, and victim's attorney, if applicable, made pursuant to section 2930.14 or 2930.17 of the Revised Code, any victim impact statement prepared pursuant to section 2947.051 of the Revised Code, and any report made under division (G) of this section. The court may consider any written statement of any person submitted to the court pursuant to division (L) of this section. If the motion alleges that the offender who is the subject of the motion is an eligible offender and the court makes an initial determination that the offender satisfies the criteria for being an eligible offender, or if the motion alleges that the offender who is the subject of the motion is a state of emergency-qualifying offender and the court makes an initial determination that the offender satisfies the criteria for being a state of emergency-qualifying offender, the court shall determine whether to grant or deny the motion. The court shall not deny judicial release under this section to an offender solely based on the classification of the offense. After ruling on the motion, the court shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender was indicted of the ruling, and the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim and the victim's representative of the ruling in accordance with sections 2930.03 and 2930.16 of the Revised Code or, if the court granted the motion, in accordance with division (K) of this section. (J)(1) A court shall not grant a judicial release under this section to an offender who is imprisoned for a felony of the first or second degree and who is under consideration as an eligible offender, or to an offender who committed an offense under Chapter 2925. or 3719. of the Revised Code, who is under consideration as an eligible offender, and for whom there was a presumption under section 2929.13 of the Revised Code in favor of a prison term, unless the court, with reference to factors under section 2929.12 of the Revised Code, finds both of the following: (a) That a sanction other than a prison term would adequately punish the offender and protect the public from future criminal violations by the offender because the applicable factors indicating a lesser likelihood of recidivism outweigh the applicable factors indicating a greater likelihood of recidivism; (b) That a sanction other than a prison term would not demean the seriousness of the offense because factors indicating that the offender's conduct in committing the offense was less serious than conduct normally constituting the offense outweigh factors indicating that the eligible offender's conduct was more serious than conduct normally constituting the offense. (2) A court that grants a judicial release under division (J)(1) of this section to an offender who is under consideration as an eligible offender shall specify on the record both findings required in that division and also shall list all the factors described in that division that were presented at the hearing. (3)(a) Subject to division (J)(3)(b) of this section, a court shall grant a judicial release under this section to an offender who is under consideration as a state of emergency-qualifying offender if the court determines that the risks posed by incarceration to the health and safety of the offender, because of the nature of the declared state of emergency, outweigh the risk to public safety if the offender were to be released from incarceration. (b) A court shall not grant a judicial release under this section to an offender who is imprisoned for a felony of the first or second degree and is under consideration for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender unless the court, with reference to the factors specified under section 2929.12 of the Revised Code, finds both of the criteria set forth in divisions (J)(1)(a) and (b) of this section. (K) If the court grants a motion for judicial release under this section, the court shall order the release of the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender, shall place the offender under an appropriate community control sanction, under appropriate conditions, and under the supervision of the department of probation serving the court and shall reserve the right to reimpose the sentence that it reduced if the offender violates the sanction. If the court reimposes the reduced sentence, it may do so either concurrently with, or consecutive to, any new sentence imposed on the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender as a result of the violation that is a new offense. Except as provided in division (N)(5)(b) of this section, the period of community control shall be no longer than five years. The court, in its discretion, may reduce the period of community control by the amount of time the offender spent in jail or prison for the offense and in prison. If the court made any findings pursuant to division (J)(1) of this section, the court shall serve a copy of the findings upon counsel for the parties within fifteen days after the date on which the court grants the motion for judicial release. If the court grants a motion for judicial release, the court shall notify the appropriate person at the department of rehabilitation and correction, and the department shall post notice of the release on the database it maintains pursuant to section 5120.66 of the Revised Code. The court also shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender was indicted that the motion has been granted. When notice to the victim is required under the Ohio Constitution, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, of the judicial release. In all other cases, unless the victim or the victim's representative has requested pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 2930.03 of the Revised Code that the victim or victim's representative not be provided the notice, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, of the judicial release in any manner, and in accordance with the same procedures, pursuant to which the prosecuting attorney is authorized to provide notice of the hearing pursuant to division (E)(2) of this section. If the notice is based on an offense committed prior to March 22, 2013, the notice to the victim or victim's representative also shall include the opt-out information described in division (D)(1) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code. (L) In addition to and independent of the right of a victim to make a statement pursuant to section 2930.14, 2930.17, or 2946.051 of the Revised Code and any right of a person to present written information or make a statement pursuant to division (I) of this section, any person may submit to the court, at any time prior to the hearing on the motion for judicial release of the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender, a written statement concerning the effects of the offender's criminal offense, the circumstances surrounding the criminal offense, the manner in which the criminal offense was perpetrated, and the person's opinion as to whether the offender should be released. (M)(1) The changes to this section that are made on September 30, 2011, apply to any judicial release decision made on or after September 30, 2011, for any eligible offender, subject to division (M)(2) of this section. (2) The changes to this section that are made on April 4, 2023, apply to any judicial release application, and any judicial release decision, made on or after April 4, 2023, for any eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender. (N)(1) Notwithstanding the eligibility requirements specified in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section and the filing time frames specified in division (C) of this section and notwithstanding the findings required under division (J)(1) and the eligibility criteria specified in division (J)(3) of this section, the sentencing court, upon the court's own motion and after considering whether the release of the offender into society would create undue risk to public safety, may grant a judicial release to an offender who is not serving a life sentence at any time during the offender's imposed sentence when the director of rehabilitation and correction certifies to the sentencing court through the chief medical officer for the department of rehabilitation and correction that the offender is in imminent danger of death, is medically incapacitated, or has a terminal illness. (2) The director of rehabilitation and correction shall not certify any offender under division (N)(1) of this section who is serving a death sentence. (3) A motion made by the court under division (N)(1) of this section is subject to the notice, hearing, and other procedural requirements specified in divisions (D), (E), (G), (H), (I), (K), and (L) of this section with respect to motions for a grant of judicial release to eligible offenders, including notice to the victim, except for the following: (a) The court may waive the offender's appearance at any hearing scheduled by the court if the offender's condition makes it impossible for the offender to participate meaningfully in the proceeding. (b) The court may grant the motion without a hearing, provided that the prosecuting attorney, victim, and victim's representative, if applicable, to whom notice of the hearing was provided under division (E) of this section indicate that they do not wish to participate in the hearing or present information relevant to the motion. (4) The court may request health care records from the department of rehabilitation and correction to verify the certification made under division (N)(1) of this section. (5)(a) If the court grants judicial release under division (N)(1) of this section, the court shall do all of the following: (i) Order the release of the offender; (ii) Place the offender under an appropriate community control sanction, under appropriate conditions; (iii) Place the offender under the supervision of the department of probation serving the court or under the supervision of the adult parole authority. (b) The court, in its discretion, may revoke the judicial release if the offender violates the community control sanction described in division (N)(5)(a) of this section. The period of that community control is not subject to the five-year limitation described in division (K) of this section and shall not expire earlier than the date on which all of the offender's mandatory prison terms expire. (6) If the health of an offender who is released under division (N)(1) of this section improves so that the offender is no longer terminally ill, medically incapacitated, or in imminent danger of death, the court shall, upon the court's own motion, revoke the judicial release. The court shall not grant the motion without a hearing unless the offender waives a hearing. If a hearing is held, the court shall afford the offender and the offender's attorney an opportunity to present written and, if the offender or the offender's attorney is present, oral information relevant to the motion. The court shall afford a similar opportunity to the prosecuting attorney, the victim, the victim's representative, the victim's attorney, if applicable, and any other person the court determines is likely to present additional relevant information. If a hearing is held, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, pursuant to the Ohio Constitution. A court that grants a motion under this division shall specify its findings on the record. (O)(1) Separate from and independent of the provisions of divisions (A) to (N) of this section, the director of the department of rehabilitation and correction may recommend in writing to the sentencing court that the court consider releasing from prison, through a judicial release, any offender who is confined in a state correctional institution and who is an eighty per cent-qualifying offender. The director may file such a recommendation for judicial release by submitting to the sentencing court a notice, in writing, of the recommendation within the applicable period specified in division (A)(3) of this section for qualifying as an eighty per cent-qualifying offender. The director shall include with any notice submitted to the sentencing court under this division an institutional summary report that covers the offender's participation while confined in a state correctional institution in school, training, work, treatment, and other rehabilitative activities and any disciplinary action taken against the offender while so confined. The director shall include with the notice any other documentation requested by the court, if available. If the director submits a notice under this division recommending judicial release, the department promptly shall provide to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the offender was indicted a copy of the written notice and recommendation, a copy of the institutional summary report, and any other information provided to the court, and shall provide a copy of the institutional summary report to any law enforcement agency that requests the report. The department also shall provide written notice of the submission of the director's notice to any victim of the offender or victim's representative, if applicable, in the same manner as is specified in divisions (E)(1) and (2) of this section with respect to notices of hearings. (2) A recommendation for judicial release in a notice submitted by the director under division (O)(1) of this section is subject to the notice, hearing, and other procedural requirements specified in divisions (E), (H), (I), and (L) of this section, including notice to the victim pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, except as otherwise specified in divisions (O)(3) to (5) of this section, provided that references in divisions (E), (H), (I), (K), and (L) of this section to "the motion" shall be construed for purposes of division (O) of this section as being references to the notice and recommendation specified in division (O)(1) of this section. (3) The director's submission of a notice under division (O)(1) of this section constitutes a recommendation by the director that the court strongly consider a judicial release of the offender consistent with the purposes and principles of sentencing set forth in sections 2929.11 and 2929.13 of the Revised Code and establishes a rebuttable presumption that the offender shall be released through a judicial release in accordance with the recommendation. The presumption of release may be rebutted only as described in division (O)(6) of this section. Only an offender recommended by the director under division (O)(1) of this section may be considered for a judicial release under division (O) of this section. (4) Upon receipt of a notice recommending judicial release submitted by the director under division (O)(1) of this section, the court shall schedule a hearing to consider the recommendation for the judicial release of the offender who is the subject of the notice. The hearing shall be conducted in open court not less than thirty or more than sixty days after the notice is submitted. The court shall inform the department and the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the offender who is the subject of the notice was indicted of the date, time, and location of the hearing. Upon receipt of the notice from the court, the prosecuting attorney shall comply with division (E) of this section, including providing notice to the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, and the department shall post the information specified in that division. (5) When a court schedules a hearing under division (O)(4) of this section, at the hearing, the court shall consider all of the following in determining whether to grant the offender judicial release under division (O) of this section: (a) The institutional summary report submitted under division (O)(1) of this section; (b) The inmate's academic, vocational education programs, or alcohol or drug treatment programs; or involvement in meaningful activity; (c) The inmate's assignments and whether the inmate consistently performed each work assignment to the satisfaction of the department staff responsible for supervising the inmate's work; (d) The inmate transferred to and actively participated in core curriculum programming at a reintegration center prison; (e) The inmate's disciplinary history; (f) The inmate's security level; (g) All other information, statements, reports, and documentation described in division (I) of this section. (6) If the court that receives a notice recommending judicial release submitted by the director under division (O)(1) of this section makes an initial determination that the offender satisfies the criteria for being an eighty per cent-qualifying offender, the court then shall determine whether to grant or deny the offender judicial release. In making the second determination, the court shall grant the offender judicial release unless the prosecuting attorney proves to the court, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the legitimate interests of the government in maintaining the offender's confinement outweigh the interests of the offender in being released from that confinement. The court shall not deny judicial release under this division to an offender solely based on the classification of the offense. If the court grants a judicial release under this division, division (K) of this section applies regarding the judicial release, including notice to the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, provided that references in division (K) of this section to "the motion" shall be construed for purposes of the judicial release granted under this division as being references to the notice and recommendation specified in division (O)(1) of this section. The court shall enter its ruling on the notice recommending judicial release submitted by the director under division (O)(1) of this section within ten days after the hearing is conducted. After ruling on whether to grant the offender judicial release under division (O) of this section, the court shall notify the offender, the prosecuting attorney, and the department of rehabilitation and correction of its decision, and shall notify the victim of its decision in accordance with the Ohio Constitution and sections 2930.03 and 2930.16 of the Revised Code. If the court does not enter a ruling on the notice within ten days after the hearing is conducted as required under this division, the division of parole and community services of the department of rehabilitation and correction may release the offender. (P) All notices to a victim of an offense provided under division (D), (E), (K), (N), or (O) of this section shall be provided in accordance with the Ohio Constitution. Section 2. That existing section 2929.20 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.